lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_markedStrongGH.txt
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meggni            PostInflIV; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meggni          PostInflIV; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmeggni  PostInflIV;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megni             PostInflIV; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megni           PostInflIV; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmegni   PostInflIV;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megteni           PostInflIV; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megteni         PostInflIV; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmegteni PostInflIV;
!----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|

!-----------------------------------------------|
!            ALLATIVE (terminalis)              |
!-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|
^[All.Sg]:^mun                        PostInflIV; ^[All.Pl]:^nun                      PostInflIV; ^[All.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gnun              PostInflIV;
!-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|
^[All.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnun        PostInflIV; ^[All.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnun      PostInflIV; ^[All.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemnun    PostInflIV;
^[All.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnnun       PostInflIV; ^[All.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnnun     PostInflIV; ^[All.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemnnun   PostInflIV;
^[All.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegnun     PostInflIV; ^[All.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegnun   PostInflIV; ^[All.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemtegnun PostInflIV;
!-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpenun      PostInflIV; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpenun    PostInflIV; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpenun    PostInflIV;
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegnun     PostInflIV; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegnun   PostInflIV; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpegnun   PostInflIV;
^[All.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesinun    PostInflIV; ^[All.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesinun  PostInflIV; ^[All.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpesinun  PostInflIV;
^[All.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnun   PostInflIV; ^[All.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnun PostInflIV; ^[All.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpetegnun PostInflIV;
!-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|
^[All.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}anun        PostInflIV; ^[All.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}anun      PostInflIV; ^[All.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gkenun    PostInflIV;
^[All.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}itnun       PostInflIV; ^[All.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itnun     PostInflIV; ^[All.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itnun          PostInflIV;
^[All.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gkenun PostInflIV; ^[All.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itnun            PostInflIV; ^[All.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itnun          PostInflIV;
!-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|
^[All.4SgPoss.Sg]:^minun              PostInflIV; ^[All.4SgPoss.Pl]:^minun            PostInflIV; ^[All.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gminun    PostInflIV;
^[All.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meggnun            PostInflIV; ^[All.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meggnun          PostInflIV; ^[All.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmeggnun  PostInflIV;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megnun             PostInflIV; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megnun           PostInflIV; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmegnun   PostInflIV;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megtenun           PostInflIV; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megtenun         PostInflIV; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmegtenun PostInflIV;
!-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|

!------------------------------------------------|
!               PERLATIVE (vialis)               |
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.Sg]:^kun                         PostInflIV; ^[Prl.Pl]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}tgun           PostInflIV; ^[Prl.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gnekun               PostInflIV;
                                                   ^[Prl.Pl]:^teggun                     PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mkun         PostInflIV; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mkun        PostInflIV; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemkun       PostInflIV;
^[Prl.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mteggun      PostInflIV; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mteggun     PostInflIV; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemteggun    PostInflIV;
^[Prl.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegnegun    PostInflIV; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegnegun   PostInflIV; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemtegnegun  PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegun       PostInflIV; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegun      PostInflIV; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpegun       PostInflIV;
^[Prl.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesigun     PostInflIV; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesigun    PostInflIV; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpesigun     PostInflIV;
^[Prl.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnegun  PostInflIV; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnegun PostInflIV; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpetegnegun  PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}akun         PostInflIV; ^[Prl.Sg.3SgPoss]:^%{.c.%}akun        PostInflIV; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gkenkun      PostInflIV;
^[Prl.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}itgun        PostInflIV; ^[Prl.Sg.3PlPoss]:^%{.c.%}itgun       PostInflIV; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itgun             PostInflIV;
^[Prl.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gkenkun PostInflIV; ^[Prl.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}akun        PostInflIV; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itgun             PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mikun               PostInflIV; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mikun              PostInflIV; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmikun       PostInflIV;
^[Prl.4PlPoss.Sg]:^megteggun           PostInflIV; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Pl]:^megteggun          PostInflIV; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmegteggun   PostInflIV;
^[Prl.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megtegnegun         PostInflIV; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megtegnegun        PostInflIV; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmegtegnegun PostInflIV;
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|

!-----------------------------------------------|
!              EQUATIVE (equalis)               |
!-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.Sg]:^tun                        PostInflIV; ^[Equ.Pl]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}stun          PostInflIV; ^[Equ.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gestun              PostInflIV;
!-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtun        PostInflIV; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtun       PostInflIV; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemtun      PostInflIV;
^[Equ.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtestun     PostInflIV; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtestun    PostInflIV; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemtestun   PostInflIV;
^[Equ.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegestun   PostInflIV; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegestun  PostInflIV; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemtegestun PostInflIV;
!-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetun      PostInflIV; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetun     PostInflIV; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpetun      PostInflIV;
^[Equ.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesistun   PostInflIV; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesistun  PostInflIV; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpesistun   PostInflIV;
^[Equ.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegetun  PostInflIV; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegetun PostInflIV; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpetegetun  PostInflIV;
!-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}atun        PostInflIV; ^[Equ.Sg.3SgPoss]:^%{.c.%}atun       PostInflIV; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gketun      PostInflIV;
^[Equ.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}itun        PostInflIV; ^[Equ.Sg.3PlPoss]:^%{.c.%}itun       PostInflIV; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itun             PostInflIV;
^[Equ.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gketun PostInflIV; ^[Equ.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itun       PostInflIV; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itun             PostInflIV;
!-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mitun              PostInflIV; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mitun             PostInflIV; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmitun      PostInflIV;
^[Equ.4PlPoss.Sg]:^megestun           PostInflIV; ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Pl]:^megestun          PostInflIV; ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmegestun   PostInflIV;
^[Equ.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megestun           PostInflIV; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megestun          PostInflIV; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gmegestun   PostInflIV;
!-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|

!----------------------------------------------|
! Obsolete Verb Root -ete                      |
!   ^[Jacobson (2001) p.78]                    |
!----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^mi                       VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Pl]:^ni                     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gni             VerbRootEte;
!----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mn        VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mn      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemn    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnn       VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemnn   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gemtegn VerbRootEte;
!----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpen      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpen    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpen    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpegn   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesin    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesin  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpesin  VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}%{E%}gpetegn VerbRootEte;
